Massachusetts, session 194th, S1885.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 39M of chapter 30 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
(f) In order to ensure the timely and consistent payment for police details assigned to
public works projects performed under this chapter, the project awarding authority shall assume
direct responsibility for maintaining police detail records, receiving invoices from, and making
direct payments to those entities providing such paid details. The cost of police details shall not
be included as part of the bid submitted by any offerer responding to a bid solicitation conducted
in accordance with this chapter. This paragraph shall be referenced or included as part of the bid
documents for public works projects.
of 1